Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 7 Miscellaneous Provisions

47-6-100.
Exemption of rights and benefits from taxation; exemption from legal process; assignability.

The right of a person to a retirement allowance or to the return of contributions, a retirement allowance itself, any optional allowance or payment on death, or any other right accrued or accruing to any person under this chapter and the moneys of the system are exempted from any state or municipal tax; are exempted from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever; and shall be unassignable except as otherwise specifically provided for in this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 18.

47-6-101.
Attempts to defraud the retirement system by means of false statements or falsified records; adjustment of erroneous payments.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statements or falsifies or permits to be falsified any records of the system in any attempt to defraud the system, as a result of such an act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, on conviction, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $500.00, imprisonment not to exceed 12 months, or both.

If any change or error in the records results in any member or beneficiary receiving from the system more or less than he would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the board shall have the power to correct such error and to adjust the payments as far as practicable in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such member or beneficiary was correctly entitled shall be paid.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 19.